Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-816
City records; inspection; reports of city officers.

All citizens of this state and other persons interested in the examination of the records kept by any officer of the city, are hereby fully empowered and authorized to examine the same free of charge during the hours the respective offices may be kept open for the ordinary transaction of business. The city council shall have power to require from any officer of the city at any time a report in detail of the transactions in his office, or any matter connected therewith.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 15, p. 513;

C.S.1922, § 3724;

C.S.1929, § 14-816;

R.S.1943, § 14-816.